lexc/verb/enhuige6.lexc
LEXICON Case3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb3oe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3oe;

LEXICON Case3oe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb5
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case5;

LEXICON Case5
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§eo§tt      #;    ! t

LEXICON AddVerbmonda
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casemonda;

LEXICON Casemonda
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^á               #;    ! ta/te
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok



LEXICON AddVerb5oe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case5oe;

LEXICON Case5oe
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeoue§tt      #;    ! t

LEXICON AddVerbmely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmely;

LEXICON Repmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AAmely§t  Impermely;
                    Imper1mely;

LEXICON Impermely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrepmely;
                      Nrepmely2;

LEXICON Imper1mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§AAmely§t  Nrepmely;
                      Nrep1mely;

LEXICON Nrepmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImpermely2;
LEXICON Nrepmely2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImpermely2;

LEXICON Nrep1mely
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImper1mely;

LEXICON NImpermely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Potmely2;
LEXICON NImpermely2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Potmely2;
LEXICON NImper1mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Pot1mely;

LEXICON Potmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely;
             Casemely;
LEXICON Potmely2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely;
             Casemely;

LEXICON Pot1mely
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely;
             Case1mely;
LEXICON AddInfmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
                Casemely;

LEXICON Verb
bolyong AddVerb5;
bong AddVerb5;
borong AddVerb5;
borzong AddVerb5;
búsong AddVerb5;
csapong AddVerb5;
cselleng AddVerb5;
cseng AddVerb5;
csikland AddVerb5;
csöng AddVerb5oe;
csöng:csönge AddVerb3oe; !Cond
csüng AddVerb5oe;
csüng:csünge AddVerb3oe;
dereng AddVerb5;
dong AddVerb5;
döng AddVerb5oe;
döng:dönge AddVerb3oe;
dühöng AddVerb5oe;
dühöng:dühönge AddVerb3oe;
dülöng AddVerb5oe;
dülöng:dülönge AddVerb3oe;
eseng AddVerb5;
fecskend AddVerb5;
feszeng AddVerb5;
fetreng AddVerb5;
forrong AddVerb5;
hajlong AddVerb5;
hord AddVerb5;
hullong AddVerb5;
hőzöng AddVerb5oe;
hőzöng:hőzőnge AddVerb3oe;
ing AddVerbmely;
jajong AddVerb5;
kereng AddVerb5;
kering AddVerb5;
kezd AddVerb5;
kong AddVerb5;
kárörvend AddVerb5;
küld AddVerb5oe;
küld:külde AddVerb3oe;
küzd AddVerb5oe;
küzd:küzde AddVerb3oe;
lappang AddVerb5;
leng AddVerb5;
lázong AddVerb5;
lézeng AddVerb5;
mereng AddVerb5;
mond AddVerb5;
mond AddVerbmonda;
pang AddVerb5;
peng AddVerb5;
rajong AddVerb5;
reng AddVerb5;
ring AddVerbmely;
ráng AddVerb5;
setteng AddVerb5;
sikong AddVerb5;
szorong AddVerb5;
szállong AddVerb5;
teng AddVerb5;
terjeng AddVerb5;
tolong AddVerb5;
tátong AddVerb5;
töpreng AddVerb5;
ujjong AddVerb5;
verseng AddVerb5;
villong AddVerb5;
visong AddVerb5;
zajong AddVerb5;
zeng AddVerb5;
zsibong AddVerb5;
zsong AddVerb5;
állong AddVerb5;
öklend AddVerb5;
ömleng AddVerb5;
örvend AddVerb5;
ődöng AddVerb5oe;
ődöng:ődönge AddVerb3oe;
őrjöng AddVerb5oe;
őrjöng:őrjönge AddVerb3oe;
